Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1594
Source material, defined.

Source material shall mean (1) uranium or thorium or any combination thereof in any chemical or physical form or (2) ores which contain by weight one-twentieth of one percent or more of uranium or thorium or any combination thereof. Source material shall not include special nuclear material.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 17.